Massachusetts, session 194th, H399.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the numerical limitations for such licenses that are
imposed upon the Town of Swansea pursuant to Section 17 of Chapter 138 of the General Laws,
or by any other general or special law to the contrary, the Swansea licensing authority may grant
up to six additional licenses for the sale of all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises
under Section 12 of said Chapter 138.
SECTION 2. The additional Section 12 licenses that are allowed pursuant to this Act may
be granted by the Swansea licensing authority only for the types of establishments that are
otherwise eligible for Section 12 licenses, and only for such establishments that are located on
the property known as and comprising the “Swansea Mall Redevelopment Area”; this property
being identified as the area located on the northerly and southerly parcels along Route 6 from the
westerly boundary of Gardner Neck Road to the westerly boundary of Milton Reiser Road, as
contained in the Town of Swansea Zoning Map, Business B District, and from Route 6 and
of 3

Route 118 in a northerly direction 3,900 feet +/- to the northerly most point of the Swansea Mall,
so called, as contained in the Town of Swansea Zoning Map, Business B District.
SECTION 3. Any additional Section 12 license that is allowed pursuant to this Act and is
granted hereunder by the Swansea licensing authority shall not be transferable to any other
person, corporation, or organization for a period of five (5) years from the date of original
issuance. Nor may any such license be transferred in violation of the limitations of Section 2 of
this Act. Any transfer in violation of Sections 2 or 3 of this Act shall render said license null and
void.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding Sections 12 and 77 of Chapter 138 of the General Laws,
the Swansea licensing authority may, in its sole discretion, restrict the grant of any additional
Section 12 license that is allowed pursuant to this Act to holders of common victualler licenses.
SECTION 5. Whenever an additional Section 12 license that is allowed pursuant to this
Act is granted hereunder by the Swansea licensing authority and subsequently revoked by said
licensing authority or determined by said licensing authority to no longer be in use at the location
of original issuance, then said license shall be returned physically, with all of the legal rights and
privileges pertaining thereto, to said licensing authority.
SECTION 6. No additional Section 12 license that is allowed pursuant to this Act may
be granted hereunder by the Swansea licensing authority unless the applicant files with said
licensing authority letters from both the Department of Revenue and a letter from the Division of
Unemployment Assistance indicating that the applicant is in good standing with those entities
and that all applicable taxes, fees, and contributions have been paid.
of 3

SECTION 7. Except as otherwise provided in this Act, the additional Section 12 licenses
that are allowed hereunder shall be subject to all provisions, restrictions and requirements of said
Chapter 138.
SECTION 8. This Act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3